fr: Type de verrouillage du trépied: Verrouillage rabattable; Verrouillage push-pull; Verrouillage rotatif; Autre
nb: Type benlås: Flipplås; Dytt- og trekklåser; Vrilås; Annet
es: Tipo de bloqueo de patas: Cerradura abatible; Cerradura de presión-tracción; Cierre giratorio; Otros
tr: Bacak Kilit Tipi: Çevirme kilit; İtme-çekme kilit; Dönme kilit; Diğer
ja: レッグロックタイプ: フリップロック; プッシュプルロック; ツイストロック; その他
el: Τύπος κλειδώματος ποδιών: Ανάποδο κλείδωμα; Κλείδωμα ώθησης-έλξης; Βιδωτό κλείδωμα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 腿锁类型: 翻转锁; 推拉锁; 扭锁; 其他
sk-SK: Typ kĺbového zámku: Sklopný zámok; Push-pull zámok; Otočný zámok; Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de trava de perna: Bloqueio giratório; Bloqueio push-pull; Fecho twist lock; Outro
sl-SI: Tip zaklepanja noge: Preklopna ključavnica; Zaklepanje na poteg; Zaklep z obratom; Drugo
nl: Beenvergrendelingstype: Klapslot; Duw-trek-slot; Draaislot; Andere
ro-RO: Tip mecanism de blocare picior: Încuietoare basculantă; Încuietoare push-pull; Blocare prin răsucire; Altele
en: Leg lock type: Flip lock; Push-pull lock; Twist lock; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de bloqueio de perna: Fechadura giratória; Fechadura de arrastar e empurrar; Fechadura rotativa; Outro
hu: Lábrögzítés típusa: Billenőzár; Tolózár; Elfordítható zár; Egyéb
ko: 다리 잠금 유형: 플립락; 푸시-풀 락; 트위스트락; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta zaključavanja nogu: Preklopna brava; Brava push-pull; Brava s ključem; Ostalo
ru: Тип фиксации штатива: Откидной замок; Нажимно-отжимный замок; Поворотный замок; Другое
sv: Benlåstyp: Fliplås; Tryck-dra-lås; Vridlås; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип ключалка на крака: Флип заключване; Заключване чрез издърпване; Заключване чрез завъртане; Други
zh-TW: 腿部鎖型: 翻轉鎖; 推拉式門鎖; 扭鎖; 其他
cs: Typ zámku nohou: Překlopný zámek; Tlačítkový zámek; Otočný zámek; Jiné
lt-LT: Kojelių užrakto rūšis: Užspaudžiamas užraktas; Patraukiamas užraktas; Pasukamas užraktas; Kita
pl: Typ blokady nogi: Zamek klapkowy; Blokada typu push-pull; Blokada skrętu; Inne
it: Tipo di blocco delle gambe: Anti ribaltamento; Chiusura push-pull; Chiusura a rotazione; Altro
fi: Lahjetyyppi: Kääntölukko; Työntö-veto-lukko; Kierrettävä lukko; Muu
th: ประเภทล็อคขา: ล็อกแบบบานพับ; ล็อกแบบดันและดึง; ตัวล็อกแบบเกลียว; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại khoá bằng chân: Khóa lật; Khóa kéo đẩy; Khóa vặn; Khác
de: Beinverschlusstyp: Kippfalle; Druckschloss; Drehriegel; Sonstiges
da: Benlåstype: Fliplås; Push-pull-lås; Drejelås; Andet